Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2311
Certificate of competency; term; revocation.

All original and renewal certificates shall be good for one year from their dates but any certificate may be revoked by the board at any time after a hearing upon sufficient notice after sworn charges are filed with the board showing the holder of the certificate to be then incompetent, guilty of willful breach of the rules, regulations or requirements of the board, or of the laws or ordinances relating thereto, or of other causes sufficient for the revocation of the certificate as determined by the city council or chairman and board of trustees of each city or village of which charges and hearing the holder of such certificate shall have written notice.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 11, p. 472.